Massachusetts, session 194th, H1065.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 58 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 6, after the word "thereof" the following
words:- , provided that a person may hunt with a bow and arrow from an elevated tree stand not
less than 250 feet from any dwelling in use except as authorized by the owner or occupant
thereof
SECTION 2. Section 64 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “, or any
crossbow, except as provided in section 69, nor” and inserting in place thereof the following the
word:- nor.
of 2

SECTION 3. Said chapter 131 is hereby further amended by striking out section 69, as so
appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:- Section 69. A person shall not
carry or use a bow and arrow or crossbow while hunting unless the bow and arrow or crossbow
meet the requirements of the rules and regulations which shall be promulgated by the director.
Such rules and regulations shall prescribe general design, weight of pull and type of bows and
arrows or crossbows and shall conform to standards generally accepted for hunting purposes.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following
paragraph:- The hunting of deer by bow and arrow shall be permitted on any date, including a
Sunday or legal holiday, that the director declares as an open season for such hunting. Except as
otherwise provided in the preceding paragraph, an open season declared by the director for the
hunting of deer by bow and arrow, which open season period occurs in whole or in part, within
the last 3 months of the calendar year, shall be for a period of not less than 7 days that shall be
consecutive.
SECTION 5. Section 57 of said chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end of the paragraph the following sentence:- Notwithstanding, this section shall
not prohibit or render unlawful, the hunting of deer by bow and arrow or the carrying on his
person a bow and arrow for the purpose of hunting deer, during any Sunday declared as an open
season for such hunting, by the director with the approval of the fisheries and wildlife board.
of 2